Idaho statutes. Title 39 HEALTH AND SAFETY
Chapter 14
HEALTH FACILITIES

Sec.

§ 39-1401. Short title.

This act may be cited as the “Health Facilities Construction Act.”

§ 39-1402. Definitions.

As used in this act:

“Agency” means the department of health and welfare;

“Federal act” shall mean, when applicable, either (1) Public Law 725 of the 79th Congress, approved August 13, 1946, entitled the Hospital Survey and Construction Act and amendments thereto or (2) Mental Retardation Facilities and Community Mental Health Centers Construction Act of 1963, Public Law 88-164, and amendments thereto or (3) Public Law 91-517 of the 91st Congress, and amendments thereto;

“Surgeon general” means the surgeon general of the United States department of health and human services;

“Health facilities” shall mean any of the following:

“Hospital” means a place devoted primarily to the maintenance and operation of facilities for the diagnosis, treatment or care for not less than twenty-four (24) hours in any week of two (2) or more nonrelated individuals suffering from illness, disease, injury, deformity, or requiring care because of old age, or a place devoted primarily to providing for not less than twenty-four (24) hours in any week of obstetrical or other medical or nursing care for two (2) or more nonrelated individuals. The term hospital includes public health centers in general, tuberculosis, mental, chronic disease and other types of hospitals, and related facilities, such as laboratories, outpatient departments, nurses’ home and training facilities, and central service facilities operated in connection with hospitals;

A facility for the provision of public health services, including related facilities such as laboratories, clinics, and administrative offices operated in connection with said facility;

A facility specially designed for the diagnosis, treatment, education, training, or custodial care of people with intellectual disabilities, including facilities for training specialists and sheltered workshops for people with intellectual disabilities, but only if such workshops are part of facilities which provide or will provide comprehensive services for people with intellectual disabilities;

A facility providing services for the prevention or diagnosis of mental illness, or care and treatment of mentally ill patients, or rehabilitation of such persons, which services are provided principally for persons residing in a particular community or communities in or near which the facility is situated or at a statewide facility;

“Secretary” means the secretary of health and human services of the United States, or his delegate to administer the federal act;

“Nonprofit facility” means a facility which is owned and operated by one (1) or more nonprofit corporations or associations no part of the net earnings of which inures, or may lawfully inure, to the benefit of any private shareholder or individual.

§ 39-1403. Administration — Division of health facilities survey and construction.

There is hereby established in the state department of health and welfare a division of health facilities survey and construction which shall be administered by a full time salaried director under the supervision and direction of the agency.

§ 39-1404. General powers and duties.

In carrying out the purposes of the act, the agency is authorized and directed:

To require such reports, inspections and investigations and prescribe such regulations as it deems necessary;

To provide such methods of administration, appoint a director and other personnel of the division on a merit basis and take such other action as may be necessary to comply with the requirements of the federal act and the regulations thereunder;

To procure in its discretion the temporary or intermittent services of experts or consultants or organizations thereof, by contract, when such services are to be performed on a part-time or fee-for-service basis and do not involve the performance of administrative duties;

To the extent that it considers desirable to effectuate the purposes of this act, to enter into agreements for the utilization of the facilities and services of other departments, agencies, and institutions, public or private;

To accept on behalf of the state and to deposit with the state treasury any grant, gift or contribution made to assist in meeting the cost of carrying out the purposes of this act as herein provided;

To make a bi-annual report to the legislature on activities and expenditures pursuant to this act, including recommendations for such additional legislation as the agency considers appropriate to furnish adequate health facilities to the people of this state;

To do all other things on behalf of the state necessary to obtain full benefits under the federal act as now and hereafter amended.

§ 39-1405. Advisory council.

The governor shall appoint such advisory councils to advise and consult with the agency charged with the carrying out of the administration of this act and shall also appoint the chairmen of all such advisory councils.

Members of the councils hereinafter created shall hold office for a term of six (6) years, their terms expiring successively on the second Monday in January in the odd-numbered years, except that any member appointed to fill a vacancy occurring prior to the expiration of the term for which his predecessor was appointed shall be appointed for the remainder of such term, and the terms of office of the members first taking office shall expire, as designated at the time of appointment, at least one-third (1/3) thereof at the end of the second year, at least one-third (1/3) thereof at the end of the fourth year, and at least one-third (1/3) thereof at the end of the sixth year after the date of appointment. Council members while serving on the business of the councils shall be compensated as provided by section 59-509(d), Idaho Code. The councils shall meet as frequently as the chairman deems necessary, but not less than once each year. Upon request by a majority of the members of a specific council, it shall be the duty of the chairman to call a meeting of that council.

The agency shall assist the governor in establishing the necessary guidelines and qualifications of appointees and direct to the attention of the governor the mandatory requirements of any federal statutes, regulations and standards concerning the number, representative capacity, professional background, and such other matters concerning membership and organization of said councils to insure state compliance with federal laws, regulations and standards.

§ 39-1406. Survey and planning activities.

The agency is authorized and directed to make an inventory of existing health facilities, including public, nonprofit and proprietary, to survey the need for construction of health facilities, and, on the basis of such inventory and survey, to develop a program for the construction of such public and other nonprofit facilities as will, in conjunction with existing facilities, afford the necessary physical facilities for furnishing adequate health facilities and similar services to all the people of the state.

§ 39-1407. Construction program.

The construction program shall provide, in accordance with regulations prescribed under the federal act, for adequate health facilities for the people residing in this state and insofar as possible shall provide for their distribution throughout the state in such manner as to make all types of health facilities reasonably accessible to all persons in the state.

§ 39-1408. Application for federal funds for survey and planning — Expenditure.

The agency is authorized to make application for and receive federal funds to assist in carrying out the activities herein provided. Such funds shall be delivered to the state treasurer and by him deposited in the funds hereinafter created. Such funds are hereby appropriated to the state board of health and welfare for expenditure for carrying out the activities authorized by this act. Any such funds received and not expended for such purposes shall be disposed of pursuant to the federal act.

§ 39-1409. State plan.

The agency shall prepare and submit to the surgeon general and/or secretary a state plan which shall include the health facilities construction program developed under this act and which shall provide for the establishment, administration, and operation of health facilities construction activities in accordance with the requirements of the federal act and regulations thereunder. The agency shall, prior to the submission of such plan to the surgeon general and/or secretary, give publicity to a general description of all the provisions proposed to be included therein and cause a public hearing to be held at which all persons or organizations with a legitimate interest in such plan may be given an opportunity to express their views. After approval of the plan by the surgeon general and/or secretary, the agency shall publish a general description of the provisions thereof in such newspapers as will give circulation in each county in the state and shall make the plan, or a copy thereof, available upon request to all interested persons or organizations. The agency as required shall review the health facilities construction program and submit to the surgeon general and/or secretary any modifications thereof which he [it] may find necessary and may submit to the surgeon general and/or secretary such modifications of the state plan, not inconsistent with the requirements of the federal act, as it may deem advisable.

§ 39-1410. Minimum standards for maintenance and operation of facilities.

The agency shall by regulation prescribe minimum standards for the maintenance and operation of health facilities which receive federal aid for construction under the state plan.

§ 39-1411. Priority of projects.

The state plan shall set forth the relative need for the several projects included in the construction program determined in accordance with regulations prescribed pursuant to the federal act and provide for the construction, insofar as financial resources available therefor and for maintenance and operations make possible, in the order of such relative need.

§ 39-1412. Construction projects — Applications.

Applications for health facilities construction projects for which federal funds are requested shall be submitted to the agency and may be submitted by the state or any political subdivision thereof or by any public or nonprofit agency authorized to construct and operate health facilities. Each application for a construction project shall conform to federal and state requirements.

§ 39-1413. Consideration and forwarding of applications.

The agency shall afford to every applicant for a construction project an opportunity for a fair hearing. If the agency, after affording reasonable opportunity for development and presentation of applications in the order of relative need, finds that a project application complies with the requirements of section 39-1412[, Idaho Code,] and is otherwise in conformity with the state plan, it shall approve such application and shall recommend and forward it to the surgeon general and/or secretary.

§ 39-1414. Inspection of projects.

From time to time the agency shall cause each construction project approved by the surgeon general and/or secretary to be inspected, and if the inspection so warrants, the agency shall certify to the surgeon general and/or secretary that work has been performed upon the project, or purchases have been made, in accordance with the approved plans and specifications, and that payment of an installment of federal funds is due to the applicant.

§ 39-1415. Construction funds.

There is hereby created an account in the trust and agency fund in the state treasury, and all moneys deposited therein are perpetually appropriated for construction projects under this act. All federal funds received from the federal government for a construction project approved by the surgeon general and/or secretary shall be delivered to the state treasurer and by him deposited in the health facilities construction account. Such money shall be used solely for payments due applicants for work performed, or purchases made, in carrying out approved projects.

§ 39-1416. Federal, state and other moneys — Joint municipal or county facilities.

Every county and municipality is authorized to accept, receive, receipt for, disburse, and expend federal and state moneys and all other moneys, public or private, made available by grant, loan, gift or devise for public health purposes, including the construction, alteration, equipping, operation and maintenance of projects authorized by this act and the federal act, subject only to the terms of such grant.

Any two (2) or more municipalities and/or counties may join together for the owning, construction, alteration, repair, equipping, operation and/or maintenance of a health facility, which may be located within or without any such municipality or county, and the funds therefor shall be contributed by each such municipality and/or county as the participating municipalities and counties may mutually agree.

Any municipality or county may enter into a contract or other arrangement with any other municipality or county to obtain health facilities or similar services, and pay for the same out of municipal or county funds.

§ 39-1417. Separability.

If any provision of this act or the application thereof to any person or circumstance shall be held invalid, such invalidity shall not affect the provisions or applications of this act which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of the act are declared to be severable.

§ 39-1418 — 39-1440. [Reserved.]

HEALTH FACILITY AUTHORITIES

§ 39-1441. Short title.

This act may be referred to and cited as the “Idaho health facilities authority act.”

§ 39-1442. Declaration of necessity and purpose — Liberal construction.

It is hereby determined and declared that for the benefit of the people of the state of Idaho and the improvement of their health, welfare and living conditions, it is essential that the people of this state have adequate medical care and health facilities; that it is essential that health institutions within the state be provided with appropriate additional means to assist in the development and maintenance of public health, health care, hospitals and related facilities; that it is the purpose of this act to provide a measure of assistance and alternative methods to enable health institutions in the state to refund or refinance outstanding indebtedness incurred for health facilities and to provide additional facilities and structures which are sorely needed to accomplish the purposes of this act, all to the public benefit and good as more fully provided herein; and it is the intent of the legislature by the passage of this act to create the Idaho health facilities authority to lend money to health institutions and to authorize the authority to acquire, construct, reconstruct, repair, alter, improve, extend, own, lease and dispose of properties to the end that the authority may be able to promote the health and welfare of the people of this state and to vest such authority with all powers to enable such authority to accomplish such purpose; it is not intended by this act that the authority shall itself be authorized to operate any such health facility. This act shall be liberally construed to accomplish the intentions expressed herein.

§ 39-1443. Definitions.

In this act, unless the context otherwise clearly requires, the terms used herein shall have the meanings ascribed to them as follows:

“Authority” means the Idaho health facilities authority created by this act.

“Bonds,” “notes” or “bond anticipation notes” and “other obligations” means any bonds, notes, debentures, interim certificates or other evidences of financial indebtedness, respectively, issued by the authority pursuant to this act.

“Health institution” means any:

private not for profit hospital, corporation or institution, or

public hospital or institution,

“Health facilities” or “facilities,” in the case of a participating health institution, means a structure or building suitable for use as a hospital, clinic, nursing home, or other health care facility, laboratory, laundry, nurses’, doctors’ or interns’ residence, administration building, research facility, maintenance, storage or utility facility, auditorium, dining hall, food service and preparation facility, mental and physical health care facility, dental care facility, nursing school, medical teaching facility, or other structures or facilities related to any of the foregoing or required or useful for the operation of a health facility, including, without limitation, offices, parking lots and garages and other supporting service structures, and all necessary, useful and related equipment, furnishings and appurtenances and including without limitation the acquisition, preparation and development of all lands, real and personal property, necessary or convenient as a site or sites for any of the foregoing; but shall not include such items as food, fuel, supplies or other items which are customarily considered as a current operating charge; facilities shall not include any property used or to be used primarily for sectarian instruction or study or as a place for devotional activities or religious worship.

“Costs” as applied to facilities financed in whole or in part under the provisions of this act means and includes the sum total of all reasonable or necessary costs incidental to the acquisition, construction, reconstruction, repair, alteration, equipment, enlargement, improvement and extension of such facilities and acquisition of all lands, structures, real or personal property, rights, rights-of-way, franchises, easements and interest acquired, necessary, used for or useful for or in connection with a facility and all other undertakings which the authority deems reasonable or necessary for the development of a facility including, but not limited to, the cost of demolishing or removing any building or structures on land so acquired, the cost of acquiring any lands to which such building or structures may be moved, the cost of all machinery and equipment, financing charges, interest prior to and during construction, and if judged advisable by the authority, for a period after completion of such construction, the cost of financing facilities, including interest on bonds and notes issued by the authority to finance facilities; reserves for principal and interest and for extensions, enlargements, additions and improvements; including without limitation the cost of studies and surveys; the costs for land title and mortgage guaranty policies; plans, specifications, architectural and engineering services; legal, organization, marketing or other special services; financing, acquisition, demolition, construction, equipment and site development of new and rehabilitated buildings; rehabilitation, reconstruction, repair or remodeling of existing buildings and all other necessary and incidental expenses to the construction and acquisition of facilities, the financing of such construction, and acquisition and the placing of facilities in operation.

“Revenues” means, with respect to facilities, the rents, fees, charges, interest, principal repayments and other income received or to be received by the authority from any source on account of such facilities.

“Refinancing of outstanding obligations” means liquidation, with the proceeds of bonds or notes issued by the authority, of any indebtedness of a participating health institution incurred to finance or aid in financing a lawful purpose of such health institution not financed pursuant to this act which would constitute a facility had it been undertaken and financed by the authority, or consolidation of such indebtedness with indebtedness of the authority incurred for a facility related to the purpose for which the indebtedness of the health institution was incurred.

authorized by law to provide or operate health facilities whether directly or indirectly through one (1) or more affiliates in the state of Idaho; and “participating health institution” means a health institution which, pursuant to the provisions of this act, shall undertake the financing and construction or acquisition of health facilities or shall undertake the refunding or refinancing of outstanding obligations as provided in and permitted by this act.

§ 39-1444. Authority — Creation — Membership — Appointment — Terms of office — Filling vacancies and removals.

There is hereby created an independent public body politic and corporate to be known as the “Idaho health facilities authority.” Said authority is constituted a public instrumentality and the exercise by the authority of the powers conferred by this act shall be deemed and held to be the performance of an essential public function. The authority shall consist of seven (7) members to be appointed by the governor who shall be residents of the state. Not more than four (4) of said seven (7) members of the authority shall be of the same political party. At least one (1) of the members to be appointed by the governor shall be or shall have been a trustee, director, comptroller or other employee of a public or not for profit hospital knowledgeable in hospital and health care construction and financing. At least one (1) such appointed member shall be a person experienced in and having a favorable reputation for skill, knowledge and experience in the field of state and municipal finance. At least one (1) of such appointed members shall be a person experienced in and having a favorable reputation for skill, knowledge and experience in the field of health facility architecture. In making appointments the governor shall take into consideration nominees recommended to him for appointment by professional organizations of hospitals, long term care facilities, investment banking and architects. The members of the authority first appointed by the governor shall serve for terms to be designated by the governor expiring on June 30, as follows: two (2) in 1973 and 1974 and one (1) each in 1975, 1976, and 1977, respectively. Upon the expiration of the term of any appointed member his successor shall be appointed for a term of five (5) years and until his successor has been appointed and has qualified. Any member shall be eligible for reappointment. The governor shall fill any vacancy for the remainder of any unexpired term. Any member of the authority may be removed by the governor for misfeasance, malfeasance or willful neglect of duty or other cause after notice and a public hearing unless such notice or hearing shall be expressly waived in writing.

§ 39-1445. Quorum — Mode of action — Expenses.

Four (4) members of the authority shall constitute a quorum for the purpose of conducting business and exercising its powers. Action may be taken by the authority upon the affirmative vote of at least four (4) of its members. No vacancy in the membership of the authority shall impair the right of a quorum to exercise all the rights and perform all the duties of the authority. Each meeting of the authority for any purpose whatsoever shall be open to the public. Notice of meetings shall be as provided in the by-laws of the authority. Resolutions need not be published or posted. Members of the authority shall receive no compensation for services but shall be entitled to the necessary expenses including traveling and lodging expenses incurred in the discharge of their duties. Any payments for compensation and expenses shall be paid from funds of the authority.

§ 39-1446. Organization meeting — Chairman — Executive director — Surety bond and conflict of interest.

A member of the authority designated by the governor shall call and convene the initial organizational meeting of the authority and shall serve as its chairman pro tem. At such meeting appropriate by-laws shall be presented for adoption. The by-laws may provide for the election or appointment of officers and the delegation of certain powers and duties and such other matters as the authority deems proper. At such meeting and annually thereafter the authority shall elect one (1) of its members as chairman and one (1) as vice chairman. It shall appoint an executive director or secretary and may appoint an associate executive director or associate secretary, who may but are not required to be members of the authority and who shall serve at its pleasure. They shall receive such compensation for special services as shall be fixed by the authority. The executive director or secretary or associate executive director or secretary, or other person designated by the authority, shall keep a record of the proceedings thereof and shall be custodian of all books, documents and papers filed with the authority, the minute books or journal thereof and its official seal. Said executive director or secretary or associate executive director or associate secretary or other person, may cause copies to be made of all minutes and other records and documents of the authority and may give certificates under the official seal of the authority to the effect that such copies are true copies and all persons dealing with the authority may rely on such certificates. The authority may delegate by resolution to one (1) or more of its members or to its executive director or secretary or associate executive director or associate secretary such powers and duties as it may deem proper. The executive director or secretary shall execute a surety bond in the penal sum of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) or, in lieu thereof, the chairman of the authority shall execute a blanket bond covering each member, the executive director or secretary and the employees or other officers of the authority, each surety bond to be conditioned upon the faithful performance of the duties of the office or offices covered, to be executed by a surety authorized to transact business in this state as surety. The cost of each such bond shall be paid by the authority. Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary it shall not constitute a conflict of interest for a trustee, director, officer or employee of any health institution, financial institution, investment banking firm, brokerage firm, commercial bank or trust company, architecture firm, insurance company or any other firm, person or corporation to serve as a member of the authority, provided such trustee, director, officer or employee shall abstain from deliberation, action and vote by the authority in each instance where the business affiliation of any such trustee, director, officer or employee is involved.

§ 39-1447. Powers.

The authority shall have the following powers together with all powers incidental thereto or necessary for the performance thereof:

to have perpetual succession as a body politic and corporate;

to adopt by-laws for the regulation of its affairs and the conduct of its business;

to sue and be sued and to prosecute and defend, at law or in equity, in any court having jurisdiction of the subject matter and of the parties;

to have and to use a corporate seal and to alter the same at pleasure;

to maintain an office at such place or places as it may designate;

to determine the location and character of any facility to be financed under the provisions of this act to acquire, construct, reconstruct, renovate, improve, replace, maintain, repair, operate, lease as lessee or lessor and regulate the same, to enter into contracts for any and all of such purposes and for the management and operation of a facility to designate a participating health institution as its agent to determine the location and character of a facility undertaken by such participating health institution, under the provisions of this act and, as agent of the authority, to acquire, construct, reconstruct, renovate, replace, improve, maintain, repair, operate, lease as lessee or lessor and regulate the same, and, as agent of the authority, to enter into contracts for any and all of such purposes including contracts for the management and operation of such facility;

to lease to a participating health institution any or all of the facilities upon such terms and conditions as the authority shall deem proper, and to charge and collect rent therefor and to terminate any such lease upon the failure of the lessee to comply with any of the obligations thereof; and to include in any such lease, if desired, provisions that the lessee thereof shall have options to renew the term of the lease for such period or periods and at such rent and upon such terms or conditions as shall be determined by the authority or to purchase any or all of the facilities or that upon payment of all of the indebtedness incurred by the authority for the financing of such facilities the authority may convey any or all of the facilities to the lessee or lessees thereof with or without consideration;

to borrow money and to issue bonds, notes, bond anticipation notes or other obligations for any of its corporate purposes and to refund the same, all as provided for in this act;

generally to fix and revise from time to time and charge and collect rates, rents, fees and charges for the use of and services furnished or to be furnished by facilities or any portion thereof and to contract with any person, association, partnership, firm or corporation or other body public or private in respect thereof;

to establish rules and regulations for the use of facilities and to designate a participating health institution as its agent, to establish rules and regulations for the use of the facilities undertaken or operated by such participating health institution; to employ or contract for consulting engineers, architects, attorneys, accountants, construction and financial experts, superintendents, managers and such other employees and agents as may be necessary in its judgment and to fix their compensation;

to receive and accept from the federal government or the state of Idaho or any other public agency loans or grants for or in aid of the construction of facilities or any portion thereof, or for equipping the same, and to receive and accept grants, gifts or other contributions from any source;
(12) to mortgage all or any portion of the facilities and the site or sites thereof, whether then owned or thereafter acquired, for the benefit of the holders of bonds issued to finance such facilities or any portion thereof;

(13) to make loans to any participating health institution, for the cost of the facilities in accordance with an agreement between the authority and such participating health institution; provided that no such loan shall exceed the total cost of such facilities as determined by such participating health institution, and approved by the authority;

(14) to make mortgage loans or other secured or unsecured loans to a participating health institution, to refund outstanding obligations, mortgages or advances issued, made or given by such institution for the cost of its facilities including the function to issue bonds and make loans to a participating health institution, to refinance outstanding obligations and indebtedness incurred for facilities undertaken and completed prior to or after the enactment of this act and when the authority finds that such financing is in the public interest and either alleviates the financial hardship upon the participating health institution or is in connection with other financing by the authority for such participating health institution or may be expected to result in a lesser cost of patient care and a saving to third parties, including state or federal governments, and to others who must pay for such health care, or any combination thereof;

(15) to do all things necessary and convenient to carry out the purposes of this act;

(16) to charge to and equitably apportion among participating health institutions its administrative costs and expenses incurred in the exercise of the powers and duties conferred by this act;

(17) to make and execute contracts and all other instruments necessary or convenient for the exercise of its powers and functions under this act.

The authority shall not have the power to operate the facilities as a business other than as a lessee or lessor. Any lease of the facilities entered into pursuant to the provisions of this act shall provide for rentals adequate to pay principal and interest on such bonds as the same fall due and to create and maintain such reserves and accounts for depreciation as the authority shall determine to be necessary.

§ 39-1447A. Public securities of health institutions — Interest exchange agreements.

As used in this section:

“Authorized entity” means any of the following entities: the authority, a county that has created a hospital board under chapter 36, title 31, Idaho Code, and that owns and operates a county hospital or health facility, or a hospital district created and existing under section 39-1331, et seq., Idaho Code, that owns and operates a hospital or health facility.

“Public securities” means bonds, notes, debentures, interim certificates, bond anticipation notes, commercial paper, or other evidences of indebtedness, or lease, installment purchase, or other agreements, or certificates of participation therein, issued or entered into by or on behalf of an authorized entity in accordance with applicable law for the purpose of financing health institutions, and including specifically leases between the authority and counties authorized by section 31-836, Idaho Code; and between the authority and hospital districts authorized by section 39-1339, Idaho Code.

An authorized entity that has issued or entered into, or proposes to issue or enter into, public securities may enter into an agreement for an exchange of payments based on interest rates or for a hedge of interest rates as provided in this section if the authorized entity finds that such an agreement would be in the best interest of the authorized entity.

An authorized entity may enter into an agreement to exchange payments based on interest rates or to hedge interest rates only if:

The long-term debt obligations of the person or entity with whom the authorized entity enters into the agreement are rated in either of the two (2) highest rating categories of a nationally recognized rating agency, without regard to any modification of the rating; or

The obligations pursuant to the agreement of the person or entity with whom the authorized entity enters into the agreement are either:

Guaranteed by a person or entity whose long-term debt obligations are rated in either of the two (2) highest rating categories of a nationally recognized rating agency, without regard to any modification of the rating; or

Collateralized by obligations deposited with the authorized entity or an agent of the authorized entity which would: (A) be legal investment for such authorized entity and is in either of the two (2) highest rating categories of a nationally recognized rating agency, without regard to any modification of the rating; and (B) have a market value at least equal to the amount the person or entity would be required to pay to the authorized entity if the agreement was terminated before its final payment date, excluding any costs, legal fees or consequential damages.

An authorized entity may agree, with respect to public securities that the authorized entity has issued or entered into, or proposes to issue or enter into, bearing interest at a variable rate, to pay sums equal to interest at a fixed rate or rates or at a different variable rate determined pursuant to a formula set forth in the agreement on an amount not to exceed the principal amount of the public securities with respect to which the agreement is made, in exchange for an agreement to pay sums equal to interest on the same principal amount at a variable rate determined pursuant to a formula set forth in the agreement.

An authorized entity may agree, with respect to public securities that the authorized entity has issued or entered into, or proposes to issue or enter into, bearing interest at a fixed rate or rates, to pay sums equal to interest at a variable rate determined pursuant to a formula set forth in the agreement on an amount not to exceed the outstanding principal amount of the public securities with respect to which the agreement is made, in exchange for an agreement to pay sums equal to interest on the same principal amount at a fixed rate or rates set forth in the agreement.
(6) An authorized entity may, with respect to public securities that the authorized entity has issued or entered into, or proposes to issue or enter into, bearing interest at a fixed rate or rates or at a variable rate or rates, or with respect to securities with respect to which it has entered into an interest rate exchange agreement as described in subsection (4) or (5) of this section, enter into an interest rate hedge agreement to hedge future interest rates including, without limitation, an interest rate cap agreement, an interest rate floor agreement or any combination thereof, on a specified principal sum in exchange for a sum of money or an agreement to pay sums equal to interest on the same principal amount at a fixed rate or rates or variable rate or rates set forth in the agreement.

Rates and charges of a revenue-producing enterprise whose revenues are pledged to or used to pay public securities of the authorized entity;

Statutory requirements concerning revenue coverage that are applicable to public securities of the authorized entity;

Tax levies to pay debt service on public securities of the authorized entity; and

Any other amounts which are based upon the rate of interest of public securities of the authorized entity.

(7) The term of an agreement entered into pursuant to this section must not exceed the term of the public securities with respect to which the agreement was made.

(8) An agreement entered into pursuant to this section is not a debt or indebtedness or liability of the authorized entity for the purposes of any limitation upon the debt or indebtedness or liability of the authorized entity or any requirement for an election with regard to the issuance of debt or indebtedness or liability that is applicable to the authorized entity.

(9) Limitations upon the rate of interest on a public security do not apply to interest paid pursuant to an agreement entered into pursuant to this section.

(10) An authorized entity which has entered into an agreement pursuant to this section with respect to those public securities may treat the amount or rate of interest on the public securities as the amount or rate of interest payable after giving effect to the agreement for the purpose of calculating:

(11) Subject to covenants applicable to the public securities, any payments required to be made by the authorized entity under the agreement may be made from money pledged to pay debt service on the public securities with respect to which the agreement was made or from any other legally available source.